Utah statutes.
3-1-44.   Registered office and agent.
(1)  An association shall continuously maintain a registered office in this
state.  The registered office may be the principal place of business of the
association.
(2) (a)  An association shall designate a registered agent.
(b)  The registered agent may be a person residing in this state, a domestic
corporation, or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this
state.
(c)  The registered agent's address shall be the same as that of the
registered office.
(3) (a)  An association shall file a statement with the Division of
Corporations and Commercial Code designating or changing its registered
office, its registered agent, or both.
(b)  The statement in Subsection (3)(a) shall set forth:
(i)  the name of the association;
(ii)  the address of the association's registered office;
(iii)  the name of the association's registered agent and the registered
agent's address; and
(iv)  a statement that the designation or change was authorized by a
resolution of the board of directors.
(4) (a)  A registered agent of an association may resign by filing with the
division a signed written notice of resignation, including a statement that a
signed copy of the notice has been given to the association at its principal
place of business.
(b)  The appointment of the agent terminates 30 days after notice is filed
with the division.
(5)  Service of process, notice, or any demand upon an association shall be
made as provided in Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act.
